Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 5. Assault and Battery

Cross references. —

As to sexual assault, see §§

6-2-302

to

6-2-306

.

As to assaulting peace officer in the performance of his duties, see §

6-5-204

.

As to escape or attempt to escape of prisoners by assault, see §

6-5-207

.

As to carrying dangerous weapons with intent to commit assault, see §

6-8-103

.

As to limitation of action for assault, see §

1-3-105

.

As to abatement of action for assault upon death of the parties, see §

1-4-102

.

As to physical examination and treatment by a registered physician upon a minor who has consented to treatment for venereal disease as not constituting an assault or assault and battery, see §

35-4-131

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d Mayhem and Related Offenses § 1 et seq.

Admissibility of evidence of character or reputation of party in civil action for assault on issues other than impeachment, 91 ALR3d 718.

Liability of hotel or motel operator for injury to guest resulting from assault by third party, 28 ALR4th 80.

Recovery by patient on whom surgery or other treatment was performed by one other than physician who patient believed would perform it, 39 ALR4th 1034.

Injury or death caused by assault as within coverage of no-fault motor vehicle insurance, 44 ALR4th 1010.

Liability for injury to martial arts participant, 47 ALR4th 403.

Franchisor's tort liability for injuries allegedly caused by assault or other criminal activity on or near franchise premises, 2 ALR5th 369.

Liability of private operator of “halfway house” or group home housing convicted prisoners before final release for injury to third person caused by inmate, 9 ALR5th 969.

Liability of vendor for food or beverage spilled on customer, 64 ALR5th 205.

§ 6-2-501.
Simple assault; battery; penalties.

A person is guilty of simple assault if, having the present ability to do so, he unlawfully attempts to cause bodily injury to another.

A person is guilty of battery if he intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another person by use of physical force.

Simple assault is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

Battery is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term of probation imposed by a judge under this subsection may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for the offense under this subsection provided the term of probation, together with any extension thereof, shall in no case exceed one (1) year.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 13, § 3.

A person is guilty of unlawful contact if he:

Touches another person in a rude, insolent or angry manner without intentionally using sufficient physical force to cause bodily injury to another; or

Recklessly causes bodily injury to another person.

An unlawful contact under subsection (g) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1996, ch. 75, § 1; 1996, ch. 91, § 1; 2000, ch. 11, § 1; 2004, ch. 99, § 1; 2009, ch. 124, § 1, ch. 169, § 4; 2014 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the last sentence in (f)(i), and in (f)(ii) substituted “five (5) years” for “two (2) years.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), deleted “unlawfully touches another in a rude, insolent or angry manner or” preceding “intentionally” and added “person by use of physical force” at the end.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (e) and (f) which read: “(e) A household member as defined by
W.S.

35-21-102

who is convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of simple assault against any other household member, after having been convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a violation of
W.S. 6-2-501(a), (b), (e) or (f),

6-2-502

,

6-2-503

,

6-2-504

or other substantially similar law of this or any other state, tribe or territory against any other household member, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. (f) A household member as defined by
W.S.

35-21-102

who commits a second or subsequent battery against any other household member shall be punished as follows: (i) A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a second offense under this subsection against any other household member, after having been convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a violation of
W.S. 6-2-501(a), (b), (e) through (g),

6-2-502

,

6-2-503

,

6-2-504

or other substantially similar law of this or any other state, tribe or territory against any other household member within the previous five (5) years is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term of probation imposed by a court under this paragraph may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for this offense under this paragraph provided the term of probation, together with any extension thereof, shall in no case exceed two (2) years; A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a third or subsequent offense under this subsection against any other household member, after having been convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or found guilty of a violation of
W.S. 6-2-501(a), (b), (e) through (g), 6-2-502, 6-2-503, 6-2-504 or other substantially similar law of this or any other state, tribe or territory against any other household member within the previous ten (10) years is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the beginning of (c), deleted “Except as provided by subsection (e) of this section”; and in the beginning of (d), deleted “Except as provided by subsection (f) of this section.”

Editor's notes. —

The Revisor's Bill,
Laws 2009, ch 169 § 4, stated in relevant part:

“(a) Notwithstanding section 2 of this act, if 2009 House Enrolled Act 75, being original House Bill 0297, is enacted into law, the amendment of
W.S. 6-2-501(b) made by that act shall not be effective.”

House Bill 0297 was enacted into law as Chapter 124. The effective amendment to this section was therefore made by Chapter 169.

Laws 2009, ch 124, § 2 provides: “The Wyoming legislature, cognizant of the decision of the United State Court of Appeals for the 10thCircuit in

United States v. Hays, 526 F.3d 674, (10

th Cir., 2008), creates the offense of unlawful contact in W.S. 6-2-501(g), to clarify the elements of the offense of simple battery for purposes of federal law, as addressed in the court's decision.”

Cross references. —

For definition of “recklessly,” see §

6-1-104

.

As to recovery of costs in actions for assault and battery, see §

1-14-125

.

Cross references. —

For definition of “recklessly,” see §

6-1-104

.

As to recovery of costs in actions for assault and battery, see §

1-14-125

.

Enhancement of charges.—

District court properly enhanced the penalties for defendant’s aggravated assault and battery convictions because defendant had been convicted of two prior felonies separately brought and tried even though they were resolved in a single plea agreement and judgment and sentence. Thompson v. State, 2018 WY 3, 408 P.3d 756,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence insufficient. —

Evidence was
insufficient to support the battery conviction where there was no
evidence regarding the victim's bodily injury resulting from defendant
punching him in the face. Villarreal v. State, 2017 WY 81, 398 P.3d 512,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2017).

Battery lesser included offense of strangulation of a household
member. —

Battery is
a lesser included offense of strangulation of a household member because
(1) the crimes share the same mental element and require bodily injury
by some type of physical force, and (2) strangulation also requires
proof that the victim was a household member and the defendant caused
bodily injury by impeding the victim's normal breathing with the specific
physical force of pressure to the throat or neck, so the elements
of the lesser crime (battery) are a subset of the greater crime (strangulation). Nickels v. State, 2015 WY 85, 351 P.3d 288,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2015).

“Apparent ability” is necessary element of crime of assault.

Settle v. State, 619 P.2d 387,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1980).

Section changes common-law definitions. —

Assault and battery, as defined at common law, were changed by the provisions of this section, which require a present ability to cause bodily harm for an assault and do not require a showing of lack of consent as an element of a battery. Ross v. State, 16 Wyo. 285, 93 P. 299,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 285, 93 P. 299,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1908).

Use of expert to explain behavior. —

Expert on battered women's testimony was admissible in trial for battery and kidnapping, where the expert's testimony was an explanation for the victim's irrational behavior in answer to defendant's specific defenses that her behavior proved he had not battered or kidnapped her. Kenyon v. State, 2004 WY 100, 96 P.3d 1016,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. Sept. 29, 2004), cert. denied, 543 U.S. 1175, 125 S. Ct. 1389, 161 L. Ed. 2d 158, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 1883 (U.S. 2005).

Defendant's conviction for battery was not subject to reversal based on admission of expert's testimony concerning domestic violence, to the effect that victims were often motivated to shift blame from the abuser to themselves and to recant when the batterer was facing criminal charges, since testimony did not purport to vouch for the credibility of defendant's wife, and did not impugn the character of defendant, and therefore was properly admitted under Wyo. R. Evid. 702..
Dean v. State, 2008 WY 124, 194 P.3d 299,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2008).

Enhancement of charges. —

Although defendant pleaded guilty and received probation for the first conviction, where the statute under which defendant was convicted exposed him to a maximum incarceration term of six months, and where defendant was not provided counsel for his first conviction, that uncounseled conviction cannot be used to enhance a subsequent charge to a felony. Brisson v. State, 955 P.2d 888,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1998).

In a case in which defendant was convicted of unlawfully touching a household member for a third or subsequent time in the past ten years, the trial court, which sentenced defendant to consecutive 2 to 5-year terms of imprisonment, imposed an illegal sentence and thereby committed reversible error. The trial court mistakenly determined that there was an available enhancement under the statute with which defendant was charged.
Garnica v. State, 2011 WY 85, 253 P.3d 489,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2011).

Assault against sleeping family member. —

There was sufficient evidence to find defendant guilty on both alternatives of: (1) unlawfully touching a household member in a rude, insolent or angry manner and (2) intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing bodily injury to a household member where the victim was awakened from sleeping on the couch at the residence where she and defendant were temporarily living by defendant punching her in the face. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

Due process required for enhancement. —

Defendant was entitled to reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard regarding the possibility of an enhanced sentence for recidivism which was satisfied where he was notified in the original charging documents that a conviction on the current charge would constitute his third conviction under the Family Violence Protection Act, and at his arraignment, defendant was notified of the prior convictions upon which the state later relied for enhanced sentencing. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

Subject matter jurisdiction determined from the face of the charging documents. —

Where the charging documents alleged that offense was defendant's third family violence offense, making the offense a felony and bringing into play the enhancement provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(f)(ii), applying the rule that subject matter jurisdiction is determined from the face of the charging documents, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction over the felony offense because the charging documents alleged elements constituting a felony. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

Assault as lesser included offense of battery. —

The crime of battery includes the lesser offense of assault, but the court is not required to give a charge to that effect, unless justified by the evidence. State v. Franklin, 70 Wyo. 306, 249 P.2d 520,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1952).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to establish that the victim suffered serous bodily injury under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-501(a)(1) and 6-1-104(a)(x) (2013) where the jury instruction only served to define one of the terms included in the elements, and there was extensive evidence showing that defendant caused the victim's broken jaw and resulting medical complications. Brown v. State, 2014 WY 104, 332 P.3d 1168,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2014).

State presented sufficient evidence that defendant caused his wife's bodily injury. Defendant committed various acts that caused his wife bodily injury, and which of those particular acts the individual jurors relied upon was irrelevant. Worley v. State, 2017 WY 3, 386 P.3d 765,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2017).

Battery not lesser included offense of sexual assault. —

Since battery requires proof of an element not required for proof of first-degree sexual assault, a lesser included offense instruction need not be given. Battery requires the intentional, knowing and reckless causing of bodily injury to another or an unlawful touching in a rude, insolent or angry manner. These are not elements of first-degree sexual assault. Sandy v. State, 870 P.2d 352,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1994).

Battery not lesser-included offense of attempted kidnapping. —

Defendant's prosecution for attempted kidnapping, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-1-301(a)(i) and

6-2-201

, was not barred by the doctrine of double jeopardy due to defendant's earlier guilty plea to battery because battery, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b), was not a lesser-included offense of attempted kidnapping under the same-elements test.
Rathbun v. State, 2011 WY 116, 257 P.3d 29,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2011).

Conviction of misdemeanor battery did not prevent prosecution for aggravated assault and battery. —

Prosecution of defendant for aggravated assault and battery was not barred by the double jeopardy provision of the Wyoming and U.S. Constitutions even though defendant had already been convicted of misdemeanor battery in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b) based on the same attack because although evidence of the greater offense existed at the time of the original conviction, the state was unable to discover such evidence despite the exercise of due diligence.
Daniel v. State, 2008 WY 87, 189 P.3d 859,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2008).

Battery not lesser included offense of interference with a peace officer. —

The crime of battery was not a lesser included offense of the crime of felony interference with a peace officer, because the elements of battery did not require that the person be a peace officer. Mueller v. State, 2001 WY 134, 36 P.3d 1151,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2001).

Convictions for burglary and battery not inconsistent. —

Verdict was not inconsistent, where the jury found the defendant guilty of burglary under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-301

, acquitted him of aggravated assault under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-502

, but found him guilty of the lesser included charge of battery under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-501

; in order to find defendant guilty of burglary, the jury only had to determine that defendant entered the residence with the intent to commit the felony of aggravated assault. Moore v. State, 2003 WY 153, 80 P.3d 191,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2003).

Sentence enhancement provision. —

Subsection (f) of this section is merely a sentence enhancement provision rather than being a new independent “battery against a household member” offense. Fall v. State, 963 P.2d 981,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1998).

When defendant convicted of battery against a household member did not rebut presentence information confirming that the victim of his prior battery and aggravated assault was the mother of his child, the district court was permitted to impose felony punishment under this section for a third offense of battery against a household member.
Romero v. State, 2010 WY 84, 233 P.3d 951,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2010), reh'g denied,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. July 20, 2010), cert. denied, 562 U.S. 1073, 131 S. Ct. 670, 178 L. Ed. 2d 499, 2010 U.S. LEXIS 9322 (U.S. 2010).

Penalty provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-501

were not ambiguous or unconstitutionally vague as a plain language interpretation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-501

(f)(ii) suggested that the term “after” was used as a conjunction to introduce the phrase “having been convicted within the previous 10 years”; under that interpretation, the statute simply required that a third battery offense must have occurred within 10 years of a previous battery or other enumerated crime. Further, the penalty portion of the statute set forth a clear and logical progression from a first battery as set forth in § 6-2-501(d), to a second battery as set forth in § 6-2-501(f)(i), to a third or subsequent battery as set forth in § 6-2-501(f)(ii), and the lead-in paragraph to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(f)(i) and (f)(ii) indicated that the penalty prescribed in subsection (f)(ii) applied to a third battery.
Jones v. State, 2011 WY 115, 256 P.3d 536,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2011).

Banishment inappropriate sentence. —

Trial court erred when it banished defendant from the county as part of his sentence for battery against a household member, his third offense felony under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b) and (f)(ii); absent extraordinary circumstances, banishment is never appropriate as having no role in the rehabilitative purposes of sentencing and is against public policy. Crabtree v. State, 2005 WY 62, 112 P.3d 618,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2005).

Violent felony under Armed Career Criminal Act. —

District court did not commit plain error when it determined that defendant's battery/domestic violence conviction under either prong of Wyoming's battery statute,
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b), qualified as a violent felony under
18 U.S.C.S. § 924(e) because defendant's conviction could have been a violent felony if it fell under two scenarios: (1) if it fell under the second prong of Wyoming's battery statute and it met
18 U.S.C.S. § 924(e)'s first definition, having as an element the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the person of another; or (2) if it fell under either prong of the Wyoming battery statute and it otherwise involved conduct that presented a serious potential risk of physical injury to another,
18 U.S.C.S. § 924(e)(2)(B).
United States v. Gonzales, 558 F.3d 1193,

2009 U.S. App. LEXIS 5371

(10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 558 U.S. 864, 130 S. Ct. 169, 175 L. Ed. 2d 107, 2009 U.S. LEXIS 5563 (U.S. 2009).

Court not required to give instruction on assault where evidence shows battery. —

Evidence on behalf of the state that the defendant snatched dark eyeglasses from the prosecuting witness and threw them on the ground is sufficient showing that a battery was committed, and it is not necessary to give an instruction on simple assault. State v. Franklin, 70 Wyo. 306, 249 P.2d 520,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1952).

Instruction regarding “unlawful touching.” —

Where the trial judge clearly explained to the jury that “unlawful touching” was an element of the crime of battery and that in the “touching” process the defendant could justifiably go only so far and no further, the instruction was adequate, proper and sufficient to explain what “unlawfully touching” was within the context of the facts of the case and the law of battery. Horn v. State, 554 P.2d 1141,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1976).

Trial court did not err when it failed to further instruct the jury in light of the jury's question regarding the term “unlawfully” as used in an instruction because, while the jury's question evidenced some initial confusion about the term, the plain language of the instruction clearly indicated that “unlawful” modified “touching.” The court referred the jury back to that proper and unambiguous instruction and the jury undoubtedly noted the plain language of that instruction and realized that it was the touching that had to be unlawful. Crabtree v. State, 2005 WY 62, 112 P.3d 618,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2005).

Instruction inappropriate in sexual assault prosecution where defendant claims no contact with victim. —

In light of the rule that a lesser included offense instruction need be given only when the trial court determines that the evidence before the jury warrants the giving of such an instruction, a proffered instruction relating to assault and battery clearly was inappropriate. The trial theory of the defendant was that he had no contact with the victim, and the testimony of the victim was that of sexual assault. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

Instruction on lesser-included offenses. —

Defendant charged with aggravated assault and battery was not entitled to jury instruction on lesser-included offenses of simple assault and of battery, since a rational jury could conclude only that defendant was using his vehicle in a manner reasonably capable of producing death or serious bodily injury. Carey v. State, 984 P.2d 1098,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1999).

Defendant, charged with strangulation of a household member, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-509

, was not entitled to a lesser included offense instruction on battery, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b), because nothing showed defendant attacked the victim other than by applying pressure to the victim's neck or throat or that the pressure applied caused pain without impeding the victim's breathing, so a jury could not rationally find defendant battered the victim without strangling the victim. Nickels v. State, 2015 WY 85, 351 P.3d 288,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2015).

District court erred in instructing the jury that assault was a lesser included offense of aggravated assault and battery where assault did not require a threat to use a drawn deadly weapon, and aggravated assault and battery did not require an attempt to cause bodily injury to another. Cecil v. State, 2015 WY 158, 364 P.3d 1086,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2015).

Information held sufficient to charge battery. —

See State v. Woodward, 69 Wyo. 262, 240 P.2d 1157,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1952).

Amendment of information. —

In a case in which defendant was convicted of unlawfully touching a household member for a third or subsequent time in the past ten years, the trial court did not abuse its discretion by permitting the State to amend the information after the case was submitted to the jury. The State was simply correcting a mechanical error.
Garnica v. State, 2011 WY 85, 253 P.3d 489,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Yount v. Strickland, 17 Wyo. 526, 101 P. 942,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1909); Wolfe v. State, 38 Wyo. 135, 264 P. 1033,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1928); Elliott v. State, 47 Wyo. 36, 30 P.2d 791,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1934); Amin v. State, 694 P.2d 119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1985); United States v. Marroquin,

2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 12029

(10th Cir. 2000).

Quoted

in

Mainville v. State, 607 P.2d 339,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 242

(Wyo. 1980); Warren v. State, 835 P.2d 304,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1992); Anderson v. State, 2002 WY 46, 43 P.3d 108,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2002); Masias v. State, 2010 WY 81, 233 P.3d 944,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(June 23, 2010).

Cited

in

Arnold v. State, 76 Wyo. 445, 306 P.2d 368,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 6

, 65 A.L.R.2d 839 (1957);
Evanson v. State, 546 P.2d 412,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1976);
Richmond v. State, 554 P.2d 1217,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1976);
Jessen v. State, 622 P.2d 1374,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1981);
Brightwell v. State, 631 P.2d 1048,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1981);
Smallwood v. State, 748 P.2d 1141,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1988);
Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990);
Eustice v. State, 871 P.2d 682,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1994);
Cundy v. State, 897 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1995);
McCulloh v. Drake, 2001 WY 56, 24 P.3d 1162,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 65

, 110 A.L.R.5th 741 (Wyo. 2001);
Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002);
Spinner v. State, 2003 WY 106, 75 P.3d 1016,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2003);
Mascarenas v. State, 2003 WY 124, 76 P.3d 1258,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2003);
Sami v. State, 2004 WY 23, 85 P.3d 1014,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(2004);
Young v. State, 2005 WY 136, 121 P.3d 145,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(2005);
Sarr v. State, 2007 WY 140, 166 P.3d 891,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Aug. 29, 2007);
Kelley v. State, 2009 WY 3, 199 P.3d 521,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Jan. 14, 2009);
Taylor v. State, 2009 WY 31, 203 P.3d 408,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 3

0 (Mar. 6, 2009);
Swain v. State, 2009 WY 142, 220 P.3d 504,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Nov. 19, 2009);
Craft v. State, 2011 WY 142, 262 P.3d 1253,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Oct. 14, 2011);
Scott v. State, 2012 WY 86, 278 P.3d 747,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 18, 2012); Balderson v. State, 2013 WY 107, 309 P.3d 809,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Sept 17, 2013); Andersen v. State, 2014 WY 88,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Jul 11, 2014); Brown v. State, 2014 WY 104,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 121

, 2014 WL 4071977 (Aug 19, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Victim Compensation and Restitution: Legislative Alternatives,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

For case note, “Wyoming Recidivist Statutes: Leniency for Criminals?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 161 (1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Indecent proposal to woman as criminal assault, 12 ALR2d 971.

Malice or intent to kill where killing is by blow without weapon, 22 ALR2d 854.

Criminal responsibility for injury resulting from hunting accident, 23 ALR2d 1401.

Acquittal on homicide charge as bar to subsequent prosecution for assault and battery, 37 ALR2d 1068.

Consent of the minor as a defense to assault with intent to commit unnatural sex act upon a minor, 65 ALR2d 748.

Attempt to commit assault as criminal offense, 79 ALR2d 597.

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility for assault, 79 ALR2d 1412.

Admissibility of extent and effect of victim's injuries, 87 ALR2d 926.

Criminal liability for excessive or improper punishment of child by parent, teacher or one in loco parentis, 89 ALR2d 396.

Intent to do physical harm as essential element of crime of assault with deadly or dangerous weapon, 92 ALR2d 635.

Admissibility of evidence of uncommunicated threats on issue of self-defense, 98 ALR2d 195.

Admissibility of evidence of victim's character or reputation for turbulence on question of self-defense, 1 ALR3d 571.

Relationship with assailant's wife as provocation depriving defendant of right of self-defense, 9 ALR3d 933.

Kicking as aggravated assault or assault with dangerous or deadly weapon, 33 ALR3d 922.

Unintentional injury to third person during attempted self-defense, 55 ALR3d 620.

Consent as defense to charge of assault and battery, 58 ALR3d 662.

Sexual nature of physical contact as aggravating offense, 63 ALR3d 225.

Constitutionality of assault and battery laws limited to protection of females only or which provide greater penalties for males than for females, 5 ALR4th 708.

Single act affecting multiple victims as constituting multiple assaults or homicides, 8 ALR4th 960.

Admissibility of expert or opinion testimony on battered wife or battered woman syndrome, 18 ALR4th 1153.

Provocation as basis for mitigation of compensatory damages in action for assault and battery, 35 ALR4th 947.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: Battered spouse syndrome as defense to homicide or other criminal offense, 11 ALR5th 871.

Employer's liability for assault, theft, or similar intentional wrong committed by employee at home or business of customer, 13 ALR5th 217.

Admissibility of threats to defendant made by third parties to support claim of self-defense in criminal prosecution for assault or homicide, 55 ALR5th 449.

Attempt to commit assault as criminal offense, 93 ALR5th 683.